Missouri, session 2026, HB2771.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 40.490, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 40.490, to read as follows:
40.490. 1. Members of the state military forces of this state who are ordered to active
state duty by the governor or adjutant general, any Missouri employee who is a member of
the National Guard of another state and who is called into active state duty by the governor or
adjutant generalof that state, or any member of any reserve component of the Armed Forces
of the United States who is called to active duty shall, upon being relieved from such duty, be
entitled to the same reemployment rights provided by Title 38 of the United States Code, the
Revised Statutes of Missouri, and all amendments thereto. The attorney general shall enforce
the reemployment rights contained in this section for members of the state military forces
who are ordered to active state duty by the governor or adjutant general.
2. Members of the Missouri National Guard who are called to active state duty
by the governor or adjutant general for a period of more than thirty consecutive days
and any Missouri employees who are members of the National Guard of another state
and are called to active state duty by the governor or adjutant general of that state for a
period of more than thirty consecutive days shall, upon being relieved from such duty,
be entitled to all rights and protections provided by the Servicemembers Civil Relief
Act, 50 U.S.C. Section 3901 et seq., and all amendments thereto.
3. Any member of the Missouri National Guard and any Missouri employee who
is a member of the National Guard of another state may bring suit in any court of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2771 & 1993 2
competent jurisdiction and appropriate venue if such individual believes that his or her
rights under this section have been violated. The attorney general may also bring suit
against an employer who violates the provisions of this section.
✔